Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 1.1 Disposition of Property of Person Killed by Another

33-1.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Decedent” means any person whose life is taken by a slayer;

“Property” shall include any real and personal property and any right or interest therein;

“Slayer” means any person who wilfully and unlawfully takes or procures to be taken the life of another.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-2.
Limitation on acquisition of property or benefit.

Neither the slayer nor any person claiming through him or her shall in any way acquire any property or receive any benefit as the result of the death of the decedent, but the property shall pass as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-3.
Statutory descent and rights.

The slayer shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent as to property which would have passed from the estate of the decedent to the slayer under the statutes of descent and distribution, or by statutory right as surviving spouse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 22.

33-1.1-4.
Wills.

The slayer shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent as to property which would have passed to the slayer by devise or legacy from the decedent, except that the provisions of §

33-6-19

shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-5.
Tenancy by entirety.

One-half (1/2) of property held by the slayer and the decedent as tenants by the entirety shall pass upon the death of the decedent to his or her estate, and the other half shall be held by the slayer during his or her life subject to pass upon his or her death to the estate of the decedent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-6.
Joint tenancy.

One-half (1/2) of any property held by the slayer and the decedent as joint tenants, joint owners, or joint obligees shall pass upon the death of the decedent to his or her estate, and the other half shall pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer unless the slayer effects a separation or severance of the property or a decree granting partition.

As to property held jointly by three (3) or more persons, including the slayer and the decedent, any enrichment which would have accrued to the slayer as a result of the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent during the life or lives of the joint tenant or tenants (excluding the slayer). If the slayer shall not become the final survivor, then, upon the death of the slayer, such enrichment shall pass to the other surviving joint tenant or tenants. If the slayer becomes the final survivor, one-half (1/2) of the property shall immediately pass to the estate of the decedent, and the other half shall pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer, unless the slayer effects a separation or severance of the property or a decree granting partition.

The provisions of this section shall not affect any enforceable agreement between the parties or any trust arising because a greater proportion of the property has been contributed by one party than by the other.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-7.
Reversion — Vested remainder.

Property in which the slayer holds a reversion or vested remainder and would have obtained the right of present possession upon the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent during the period of the life expectancy of the decedent if he or she held the particular estate, or if the particular estate is held by a third person it shall remain in his or her hands for such period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-8.
Interest subject to life of decedent.

Any interest in property, whether vested or not, held by the slayer subject to be divested, diminished in any way, or extinguished if the decedent survives him or her or lives to a certain age, shall be held by the slayer during his or her lifetime or until the decedent would have reached such age but shall then pass as if the decedent had died immediately thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-9.
Contingent remainder — Future interest.

As to any contingent remainder or executory or other future interest held by the slayer subject to become vested in him or her or increased in any way for him or her upon the condition of the death of the decedent:

If the interest would not have become vested or increased if he or she had predeceased the decedent, he or she shall be deemed to have so predeceased the decedent;

In any case, the interest shall not be vested or increased during the period of the life expectancy of the decedent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-10.
Exercise of power of appointment.

As to any exercise of a power of appointment in favor of the slayer in the will of the decedent, the slayer shall be deemed to have predeceased the decedent and the appointment to have lapsed.

Property held either presently or in remainder by the slayer subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of revocation or a general power of appointment shall pass to the estate of the decedent; and property so held by the slayer subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of appointment to a particular person or persons, or to a class of persons, shall pass to such person or persons, or class of persons in equal shares to the members of such class of persons, exclusive of the slayer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-11.
Insurance proceeds.

Insurance proceeds payable to the slayer as the beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the decedent or as the survivor of a joint life policy, even though such policy or certificate was procured and maintained by the slayer and even though he or she paid all the premiums, shall be paid as if the slayer had predeceased the insured.

If the decedent is beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the slayer, the proceeds shall be paid to the estate of the decedent upon the death of the slayer, unless the policy names some person other than the slayer or his or her estate as alternate beneficiary, or unless the slayer, by naming a new beneficiary or assigning the policy, performs an act which would have deprived the decedent of his or her interest in the policy if he or she had been living.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-12.
Insurance companies, banks, or other obligors — Relief from liability when payment made without notice.

Any insurance company making payment according to the terms of its policy or any bank or other person performing an obligation for the slayer as one of several joint obligors shall not be subjected to additional liability by the terms of this chapter if such payment or performance is made without written notice of the killing by a slayer, at the home office of the insurance company or bank, home, or business address of the other person, of circumstances tending to bring it within the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-13.
Purchasers for value without notice.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect the rights of any person who, before the interests of the slayer have been adjudicated, purchases from the slayer for value and without notice property which the slayer would have acquired except for the terms of this chapter; but all proceeds received by the slayer from such sale shall be held by him or her in trust for the persons entitled to the property under the provisions of this chapter, and the slayer shall also be liable both for any portion of the proceeds which he or she may have dissipated and for any difference between the actual value of the property and the amount of the proceeds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-14.
Record of conviction admissible in civil actions.

The record of his or her conviction of having wilfully and unlawfully killed the decedent shall be admissible in evidence against a claimant of property in any civil action arising under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-15.
Construction.

This chapter shall not be considered penal in nature, but shall be construed broadly in order to effect the policy of this state that no person shall be allowed to profit by his or her own wrong.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.

33-1.1-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 62, § 1.